Arkansas, session 2025, HB1689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-626 is amended to read as follows:
6-13-626. Access of military recruiters to school facilities and
records — Definitions.
(a) If the board of directors of a school district permits access to
the school grounds, facilities, and records by any person or group of persons
whose purpose is to make students aware of occupational and educational
options and opportunities, the A public school district board of directors
shall also permit such grant access on the same basis within each high school
in its district to official recruiting representatives of the military forces
*TNL161*
03/05/2025 7:39:08 AM TNL161

HB1689
recruiters of the state and the United States to enable those official
recruiting representatives to inform students of educational and career
opportunities available in the military.
(b) If a public high school does not grant access within the public
high school to prospective employers, institutions of higher education,
career entities, educational entities, and occupational entities, then the
public high school shall grant only limited access within the public high
school to military forces recruiters only to the extent to allow the military
forces recruiters to engage with students in grades ten through twelve (10-
12) in an in-person setting during normal school hours and at events that are
open to the public and outside of normal school hours.
(c) A military forces recruiter shall be permitted to engage with all
students in a public high school regardless of academic standing, class
enrollment, career aspirations, or participation in extracurricular
activities.
(d)(1) Each public high school shall provide an equal opportunity for
a military forces recruiter to present in person to students in grades ten
through twelve (10-12).
(2)(A) A military forces recruiter shall not be restricted by a
public school district to specific events, locations, or time periods unless
the restrictions to specific events, locations, or time periods apply to
prospective employers, institutions of higher education, career entities,
educational entities, and occupational entities.
(B) However, a restriction under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of
this section shall not prevent access of military forces recruiters to public
high schools as defined by this section.
(e)(1) A military forces recruiter shall be permitted to distribute
and collect information, administer surveys, and receive student contact
details in the same manner and under the same conditions as prospective
employers, institutions of higher education, career entities, educational
entities, and occupational entities.
(2) A public high school shall not impose additional privacy or
administrative barriers or parental consent requirements on a military forces
recruiter that are not imposed on prospective employers, institutions of
higher education, career entities, educational entities, and occupational
entities.
03/05/2025 7:39:08 AM TNL161

HB1689
(f) The Secretary of the Department of the Military shall:
(1) Collect information from Arkansas National Guard recruiters
regarding compliance with this section by public school districts; and
(2) Prepare and submit an annual compliance report to the
Secretary of the Department of Education based on information collected under
subdivision (f)(1) of this section that shall:
(A) Identify each public school district found to be in
violation of this section; and
(B) Explain the basis for determining a public school
district is in violation of this section.
(g)(1) Each public high school shall inform all students in grades ten
through twelve (10-12) of opportunities to receive direct military forces
recruiter engagement and information about educational and career
opportunities available in the military forces.
(2) The information required under subdivision (g)(1) of this
section shall be provided electronically and through a student advisory or
homeroom session or class period.
(h) As used in this section:
(1) "Access" means the ability of military forces recruiters to:
(A) Engage with all students in grades ten through twelve
(10-12) in an in-person setting during normal school hours and at events that
are open to the public and outside of normal school hours;
(B) Present career and educational opportunities to
students in the same manner and under the same conditions as prospective
employers, institutions of higher education, career entities, educational
entities, and occupational entities; and
(C) Collect and distribute information, sign up students
for further engagement, and schedule follow-up meetings to the same extent as
prospective employers, institutions of higher education, career entities,
educational entities, and occupational entities; and
(2) "Military forces" means the Arkansas National Guard, United
States Army, United States Marine Corps, United States Navy, United States
Air Force, United States Space Force, United States Coast Guard, and the
federal reserve components of each of the federal bodies.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 50, Subchapter 1, is amended
03/05/2025 7:39:08 AM TNL161

HB1689
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-50-107. Access of military forces recruiter to career and precollege
academies and secondary career and technical centers — Definition.
(a) A state-supported career academy, precollege academy, secondary
career center, or technical center shall permit access to official recruiting
representatives of the military forces to enable those representatives to
inform students enrolled in the state-supported career academy, precollege
academy, secondary career center, or technical center of educational and
career opportunities available in the military forces.
(b) As used in this section, "military forces" means the Arkansas
National Guard, United States Army, United States Marine Corps, United States
Navy, United States Air Force, United States Space Force, United States Coast
Guard, and the federal reserve components of each of the federal bodies.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 61, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-61-144. Access of military recruiter to postsecondary institution
facilities — Definition.
(a) A state-supported institution of higher education shall permit
access to official recruiting representatives of the military forces to
enable those representatives to inform students enrolled in the state-
supported institution of higher education of educational and career
opportunities available in the military.
(b) As used in this section, "military forces" means the Arkansas
National Guard, United States Army, United States Marine Corps, United States
Navy, United States Air Force, United States Space Force, United States Coast
Guard, and the federal reserve components of each of the federal bodies.









03/05/2025 7:39:08 AM TNL161